Tennessee, session 114, HB2270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following new section:
On or before January 15, 2027, the department of finance and administration, in
consultation with the attorney general and reporter or other departments or agencies of
state or local government, is urged to study and submit a report to the general assembly
on state funding sources derived from litigation or investigations in this state that are
used to support the protection of children's mental health and safety online, including,
but not limited to, any civil penalties recovered by the state in any actions brought
pursuant to the Protecting Children from Social Media Act, compiled in title 47, chapter
18, part 57, or other laws. If such study is conducted, then the report shall include the
description of the manner in which the funds are being used.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2270
012058
- 1 -